Tennessee, session 114, HB2336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-2109, is amended by deleting
"via their websites" and substituting "by electronic means as specified by the federal trade
commission and the attorney general and reporter".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2336
012011
- 1 -